Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2902.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-410.01, to read: START_STATUTE16-410.01. Affirmation of electoral college The legislature AFFIRMS the importance of the electoral college for presidential elections in this country for the following reasons: 1. The founding fathers enshrined the ELECTORAL college in the United States CONSTITUTION because they thought it was the best method to choose the president. 2. The ELECTORAL college ensures that all parts of the COUNTRY are involved in SELECTING the President of the United States. 3. The ELECTORAL college guarantees certainty to the outcome of the presidential election. END_STATUTE